Indiana, session 2026, HB1096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-7-13-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A person who, on the day of the
next general, municipal, or special election, will meet the age and
residency requirements of section 1 of this chapter may register and
vote in the primary election, subject to IC 3-10-1-6.5.
SECTION 2. IC 3-7-14-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As provided in 52 U.S.C. 20504(c)(2), the
registration form described in section 5 of this chapter must meet the
following requirements:
(1) The form may not require information that duplicates
information required in the driver's license application part of the
form, except as set forth in subdivision (3).
(2) The form may require only the minimum amount of
information necessary to do the following:
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(A) Prevent duplication of voter registrations.
(B) Permit the circuit court clerk or board of registration to:
(i) assess the eligibility of the applicant; and
(ii) administer the election and voter registration system.
(3) The form must include a statement that does the following:
(A) Sets forth each eligibility requirement for registration
(including citizenship).
(B) Contains an attestation that the applicant meets each of the
eligibility requirements.
(C) Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of
perjury.
(4) The form must include the following, in print that is identical
to the print used in the attestation part of the application:
(A) Information setting forth the penalties provided by law for
submission of a false voter registration application.
(B) A statement that, if an applicant declines to register to
vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will
remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration
purposes.
(C) A statement that if an applicant does register to vote, the
office at which the applicant submits a voter registration
application will remain confidential and will be used only for
voter registration purposes.
(D) The text "Would you like to choose your political
party? If you wish to vote in a primary election, you must
first choose your political party affiliation and may only
vote that party's ballot in the primary election." and a
blank space for the applicant to list a party affiliation.
(b) The registration form described in section 5 of this chapter must
include a statement informing the individual that if the individual is
registering for the first time, the appropriate information required under
IC 3-7-33-4.7 must be submitted with the registration form in order to
avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting for the
first time.
SECTION 3. IC 3-7-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The registration form prescribed under
section 4 of this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The form must be equivalent to the mail registration form
prescribed by the election division under IC 3-7-31 and in
compliance with 52 U.S.C. 20506(a)(6)(A)(ii).
(2) The form must include a statement that does the following:
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(A) Sets forth each eligibility requirement for registration
(including citizenship).
(B) Contains an attestation that the applicant meets each of the
eligibility requirements.
(C) Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of
perjury, and the date the form was signed.
(3) The form must include the following as provided in 52 U.S.C.
20506(a)(6)(B):
(A) A question reading "If you are not registered to vote where
you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here
today?".
(B) A statement reading "Applying to register or declining to
register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that
you will be provided by this agency.".
(C) Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the
applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote.
(D) A statement in close proximity to the boxes and in
prominent type: "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX,
YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT
TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.".
(E) A statement reading "If you would like help in filling out
the voter registration application form, we will help you. The
decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill
out the application form in private.".
(F) A statement reading "If you believe that someone has
interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to
vote, or your right to choose your political party or other
political preference, you may file a complaint with (insert the
title, address, and telephone number of the NVRA official). If
you want you may first try to solve the problem by filing a
complaint with the county voter registration office of the
county where the violation occurred.".
(G) The text "Would you like to choose your political
party? If you wish to vote in a primary election, you must
first choose your political party affiliation and may only
vote that party's ballot in the primary election." and a
blank space for the applicant to list a party affiliation.
(b) The registration form prescribed under section 4 of this chapter
must include a statement informing the individual that if the individual
is registering for the first time, the appropriate information required
under IC 3-7-33-4.7 must be submitted with the registration form in
order to avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


for the first time.
SECTION 4. IC 3-7-16-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The registration form prescribed under
section 11 of this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The form must be equivalent to the mail registration form
prescribed by the election division under IC 3-7-31 and in
compliance with 52 U.S.C. 20506(a)(6)(A)(ii).
(2) The form must include a statement that does the following:
(A) Sets forth each eligibility requirement for registration
(including citizenship).
(B) Contains an attestation that the applicant meets each of the
eligibility requirements.
(C) Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of
perjury, and the date the form was signed.
(3) The form must include the following as provided in 52 U.S.C.
20506(a)(6)(B):
(A) A question reading "If you are not registered to vote where
you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here
today?".
(B) A statement reading "Applying to register or declining to
register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that
you will be provided by this agency.".
(C) Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the
applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote.
(D) A statement in close proximity to the boxes and in
prominent type: "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX,
YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT
TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.".
(E) A statement reading "If you would like help in filling out
the voter registration application form, we will help you. The
decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill
out the application form in private.".
(F) A statement reading "If you believe that someone has
interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to
vote, or your right to choose your political party or other
political preference, you may file a complaint with (insert the
title, address, and telephone number of the NVRA official). If
you want you may first try to solve the problem by filing a
complaint with the county voter registration office of the
county where the violation occurred.".
(G) The text "Would you like to choose your political
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


party? If you wish to vote in a primary election, you must
first choose your political party affiliation and may only
vote that party's ballot in the primary election." and a
blank space for the applicant to list a party affiliation.
(4) The form must be designed to make voter registration as
accessible as possible for persons with disabilities.
(b) The registration form prescribed under section 11 of this chapter
must include a statement informing the individual that if the individual
is registering for the first time, the appropriate information required
under IC 3-7-33-4.7 must be submitted with the registration form in
order to avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting
for the first time.
SECTION 5. IC 3-7-18-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The registration form prescribed under
section 3 of this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The form must be equivalent to the mail registration form
prescribed by the election division under IC 3-7-31 and in
compliance with 52 U.S.C. 20506(a)(6)(A)(ii).
(2) The form must include a statement that does the following:
(A) Sets forth each eligibility requirement for registration
(including citizenship).
(B) Contains an attestation that the applicant meets each of the
eligibility requirements.
(C) Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of
perjury, and the date the form was signed.
(3) The form must include the following as provided in 52 U.S.C.
20506(a)(6)(B):
(A) A question reading "If you are not registered to vote where
you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here
today?".
(B) A statement reading "Applying to register or declining to
register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that
you will be provided by this agency.".
(C) Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the
applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote.
(D) A statement in close proximity to the boxes and in
prominent type: "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX,
YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT
TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.".
(E) A statement reading "If you would like help in filling out
the voter registration application form, we will help you. The
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill
out the application form in private.".
(F) A statement reading "If you believe that someone has
interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to
vote, or your right to choose your political party or other
political preference, you may file a complaint with (insert the
title, address, and telephone number of the NVRA official). If
you want you may first try to solve the problem by filing a
complaint with the county voter registration office of the
county where the violation occurred.".
(G) The text "Would you like to choose your political
party? If you wish to vote in a primary election, you must
first choose your political party affiliation and may only
vote that party's ballot in the primary election." and a
blank space for the applicant to list a party affiliation.
(b) The registration form prescribed under section 3 of this chapter
must include a statement informing the individual that if the individual
is registering for the first time, the appropriate information required
under IC 3-7-33-4.7 must be submitted with the registration form in
order to avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting
for the first time.
SECTION 6. IC 3-7-22-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A mail registration form prescribed under
section 3 of this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The form must include a statement that does the following:
(A) Sets forth each eligibility requirement for registration
(including citizenship).
(B) Contains an attestation that the applicant meets each of the
eligibility requirements.
(C) Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of
perjury.
(2) The form must include, in print that is identical to the print
used in the attestation part of the application, information setting
forth the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter
registration application.
(3) The question "Are you a citizen of the United States of
America?" and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate
whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United States.
(4) The question "Will you be 18 years of age on or before
election day?" and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate
whether or not the applicant will be eighteen (18) years of age on
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


or before election day.
(5) A statement informing the individual that, if the individual is
registering for the first time, the appropriate information required
under 52 U.S.C. 21083 or IC 3-7-33-4.7 must be submitted with
the registration form in order to avoid the additional identification
requirements upon voting for the first time.
(6) The text "Would you like to choose your political party?
If you wish to vote in a primary election, you must first choose
your political party affiliation and may only vote that party's
ballot in the primary election." and a blank space for the
applicant to list a party affiliation.
SECTION 7. IC 3-7-26.4-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.81-2005,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to a person other than
a registered voter requesting information about the registered voter.
(b) After a person files a request with the election division for voter
registration information compiled under this chapter, the election
division shall provide a compilation of the information from the
computerized list to the person, redacting the information described in
subsection (c).
(c) The election division shall not provide information under this
section concerning any of the following information concerning a
voter:
(1) Date of birth.
(2) Gender.
(3) (2) Telephone number or electronic mail address.
(4) Voting history.
(5) (3) A voter identification number or another unique field
established to identify a voter.
(6) The date of registration of the voter.
SECTION 8. IC 3-7-26.4-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Unless otherwise prohibited by this article, an
individual who is not described in section 6 of this chapter is
entitled to review data concerning registered voters that has been
collected and maintained on the computerized list.
(b) The election division shall provide copies of the data
described in subsection (a) on one (1) or more of the following:
(1) A tangible device that stores electronic files, such as a flash
drive.
(2) A computer generated list, such as an electronic
spreadsheet, provided to the individual by electronic mail.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(c) The election division may contract with a private vendor to
make data available under subsection (b).
(d) The election division may charge fees that do not exceed the
following for providing copies of data requested under this section:
(1) Five hundred dollars ($500) for the statewide voter
registration list.
(2) Fifty dollars ($50) for a county voter registration list.
(3) Seventy-five dollars ($75) for a state house district voter
registration list.
(4) One hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a state senate district
voter registration list.
(5) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a congressional
district voter registration list.
(e) Data provided by the election division under this section may
not be used for commercial purposes. A person who intentionally
uses the computerized list for commercial purposes commits a
Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 9. IC 3-7-27-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2024,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As required under 52 U.S.C. 20507(i), a
county voter registration office shall retain records concerning the
implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose
of ensuring the accuracy and currency of the voter registration list.
These records include the following:
(1) Lists of names and addresses of voters who were sent notices
under the voter list maintenance program.
(2) Information concerning whether a voter has responded to a
notice described by subdivision (1) as of the date the inspection
of the record is made.
(b) The county voter registration office shall retain the records
described by this section for at least two (2) years. Except for records
concerning declinations to register to vote or that indicate the identity
of a voter registration agency where a person registered, the county
voter registration office shall make the records available for public
inspection and photocopying at a reasonable cost as provided in
IC 5-14-3.
(c) In accordance with IC 5-14-3-3(h) and notwithstanding any other
statute, a county voter registration office shall, with regard to voter
registration information concerning voters of the county on a
computerized system, act in accordance with a nondiscriminatory
uniform policy adopted by the county election board. The policy must:
(1) apply to all records maintained in the computerized list,
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


including election administration records and absentee activity
reports; and
(2) either:
(A) permit a person to duplicate or obtain a duplicate copy of
a computer disc or other similar record system that contains
this voter registration information; or
(B) not permit the person to duplicate or obtain a duplicate
copy of the information.
Notwithstanding IC 5-14-3-8, the county election board may adopt a
nondiscriminatory uniform fee for the production of this electronic
record.
(d) A person who requests computerized voter registration
information under subsection (c) must provide a written statement that
the person will not:
(1) use the information to solicit merchandise, goods, services, or
subscriptions; or
(2) sell, loan, give away, or otherwise deliver the information
obtained by the request to any other person;
for a purpose other than political activities or political fundraising
activities.
(e) Publication of information obtained under subsection (d) in a
news broadcast or newspaper is not prohibited.
SECTION 10. IC 3-7-27-6.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.240-2025,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
absentee activity reports and other election day reports must be
provided by 10 a.m., noon, 2 p.m., and 4 p.m. on election day.
(b) Upon the unanimous vote of the county election board's entire
membership, a county election board may specify in a policy adopted
under section 6(c) of this chapter, times for the provision of absentee
activity reports and other election day reports that differ from the times
required under subsection (a).
SECTION 11. IC 3-7-29-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (f), this
section does not apply to a county that:
(1) has adopted an order under section 6(a)(1) of this chapter; or
(2) is a vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1.
(b) Not later than ten (10) days before the election at which the
registration record is to be used, the county voter registration office
shall prepare certified copies of the list of registered voters for each
precinct in the county.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(c) The lists must contain the following information concerning
each registered voter:
(1) The full name of the voter.
(2) The address of the voter.
(3) The assigned voter identification number.
(4) Whether the voter is required to provide additional
identification before voting either in person or by absentee ballot.
(5) The date of birth of the voter, including an indication whether
the voter is less than eighteen (18) years of age for a poll list used
in a primary election.
(6) The scanned signature of the voter.
(7) Whether the voter is required to provide an affirmation of the
voter's residence.
(8) A bar code that allows the county voter registration office to
efficiently record whether the voter has signed the poll list.
(9) For a poll list used in a primary election, a letter abbreviation
of the name of the major political party whose ballot that the
voter has requested. is affiliated with under IC 3-10-1-6.5.
(10) A space for a poll clerk to indicate when a voter has cast an
absentee ballot.
(11) A space for a poll clerk to indicate when a voter has cast a
provisional ballot.
(12) For a voter required to submit additional documentation
required under IC 3-7-33-4.5 or IC 3-7-33-4.7, a space for a poll
clerk to insert letters serving as an abbreviation for the type of
documentation provided by the voter.
(d) The names shall be arranged in the same order as they are in the
registration record of the precinct.
(e) The poll list must also contain a statement at the top of each
page indicating that an individual who knowingly makes a false
statement:
(1) by signing a poll list; or
(2) on a poll list concerning the individual's name, voter
identification number, or residence address;
commits a Level 6 felony as provided by IC 3-14-2-11.
(f) This subsection applies to a county that has adopted an order
under section 6(a)(1) of this chapter or is a vote center county under
IC 3-11-18.1. The precinct election board shall post in a location within
the precinct or vote center a notice that:
(1) is clearly visible to an individual (or to an individual providing
assistance under IC 3-11-9) who is providing information to a
precinct election officer using an electronic poll book; and
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) indicates that an individual commits a Level 6 felony under
IC 3-14-2-11, if the individual knowingly makes a false statement
to a precinct election officer concerning:
(A) the individual's name;
(B) the individual's voter identification number; or
(C) the individual's residence address.
SECTION 12. IC 3-7-39-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A voter who
changes residence shall transfer the voter's registration to the address
where the voter currently resides by sending a transfer of registration
on a prescribed form to the circuit court clerk or board of registration.
(b) A form prescribed under subsection (a) must include the text
"Would you like to choose or change your political party? If you
wish to vote in a primary election, you must first choose your
political party affiliation and may only vote that party's ballot in
the primary election." and a blank space for the applicant to list a
party affiliation.
SECTION 13. IC 3-10-1-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as
provided in section 6.5(e) and 6.5(f) of this chapter, a voter may vote
at a primary election
(1) if the voter at the last general election, voted for a majority of
the regular nominees of the political party holding the primary
election; or
(2) if the voter did not vote at the last general election, but intends
to vote at the next general election for a majority of the regular
nominees of the political party holding the primary election;
as long as the voter was registered as a voter at the last general election
or has registered since then. has affiliated with a political party
under section 6.5 of this chapter not later than one hundred
nineteen (119) days before the date of the primary election.
(b) A voter may only vote in the primary election held by the
political party with which the voter affiliates under section 6.5 of
this chapter.
SECTION 14. IC 3-10-1-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) A voter is eligible to vote in a primary election
if the voter has properly affiliated with a political party under this
section.
(b) An individual may affiliate with a major political party at
the time the individual registers to vote under IC 3-7.
(c) A county voter registration office must automatically
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


affiliate each voter within its jurisdiction who:
(1) is registered to vote in Indiana on July 1, 2025; and
(2) has previously voted in a primary election;
with the political party whose ballot the voter last voted in a
primary election. The county voter registration office must affiliate
a voter described in this subsection by entering the voter's party
affiliation into the computerized list (as defined in IC 3-7-26.3-2).
(d) A voter who is registered to vote in Indiana on July 1, 2025,
but has not previously voted in a primary election, may affiliate
with a political party under subsection (f).
(e) An individual may affiliate with a political party during the
registration process later than one hundred nineteen (119) days
before the date of the primary election if the individual:
(1) moved to Indiana later than one hundred nineteen (119)
days before the date of the primary election from another
state and the individual authorized cancellation of the
individual's previous registration in the other state; or
(2) is seventeen (17) years of age but will be at least eighteen
(18) years of age on the day of the next general, municipal, or
special election.
An individual who is described in this subsection may vote in the
next primary election.
(f) A registered voter in Indiana may change the voter's party
affiliation less than one hundred nineteen (119) days before the
date of the primary election and vote in the next primary election,
if the voter:
(1) changes residence to an address in a different election
district;
(2) transfers the voter's registration to the address where the
voter now resides; and
(3) changes the voter's party affiliation when transferring the
voter's registration.
(g) A county voter registration office shall distribute a voter
affiliation form to each voter who requests to:
(1) affiliate with a political party; or
(2) change the voter's political party affiliation.
The election division shall prescribe the design of the voter
affiliation form which must include the text "Would you like to
choose your political party? If you wish to vote in a primary
election, you must first choose your political party affiliation and
may only vote that party's ballot in the primary election." and a
blank space for the applicant to list a party affiliation. The county
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


voter registration office must affiliate a voter or change the voter's
political party affiliation by entering the voter's party affiliation
into the computerized list (as defined in IC 3-7-26.3-2). Except as
provided in subsection (h), a voter may affiliate or change the
voter's political party affiliation at any time.
(h) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), a voter may not
affiliate with a political party or change party affiliation on the
date of the primary election or one hundred nineteen (119) days
before the date of the primary election.
SECTION 15. IC 3-10-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2015,
SECTION 149, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A person who will be a voter
at the general election for which the primary is being held and whose
name does not appear on the registration record of the precinct, the
certified copy of the registration record prepared under IC 3-7-29, or
the electronic poll list may:
(1) vote if the county voter registration office provides a signed
certificate of error; or
(2) cast a provisional ballot under IC 3-11.7, as provided by 52
U.S.C. 21082.
(b) A person who votes or casts a provisional ballot under this
section shall make an affidavit that identifies the political party
that the person is affiliated with and may only vote for candidates
of that political party.
SECTION 16. IC 3-10-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.241-2025,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. A voter who resides in any precinct may
challenge a voter or person who offers to vote at a primary election.
The challenged person may not vote unless the challenged person:
(1) is registered;
(2) makes:
(A) an oral or a written affirmation under IC 3-10-12; or
(B) an affidavit:
(i) that the challenged person is a voter of the precinct; or
(ii) required under IC 3-10-11 if the voter declares that the
voter is entitled to vote under IC 3-10-11; and
(3) either: is affiliated under section 6.5 of this chapter with
the political party of the party's ballot the challenged person
has requested to vote.
(A) at the last general election voted for a majority of the
regular nominees of the political party for whose candidates
the challenged person proposes to vote in the primary election
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


and intends to vote for the regular nominees of the political
party at the next general election; or
(B) if the challenged person did not vote at the last general
election, intends to vote at the next general election for a
majority of the regular nominees of the political party holding
the primary election.
SECTION 17. IC 3-10-1-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) A voter who desires to vote must give the
voter's name and political party to the poll clerks of the precinct on
primary election day. In a vote center county using an electronic poll
book, two (2) election officers who are not members of the same
political party must be present when a voter signs in on the electronic
poll book. The poll clerks shall require the voter to write the following
on the poll list or to provide the following information for entry into the
electronic poll book:
(1) The voter's name.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (d), the voter's current
residence address.
(3) The name of the voter's party. A voter shall mark the voter's
political party ballot selection on the electronic poll book instead
of communicating the selection to the poll clerks. After:
(A) the voter writes the voter's party on the poll list; or
(B) the voter's party is entered into the electronic poll book;
the voter may not change the choice of the voter's party. For the
voter to cast a vote, the voter's party must be the same as the
party affiliation in the voter's registration record and the
voter may only vote that party's ballot.
(b) The poll clerks shall:
(1) ask the voter to provide or update the voter's voter
identification number;
(2) tell the voter the number the voter may use as a voter
identification number; and
(3) explain to the voter that the voter is not required to provide a
voter identification number at the polls.
(c) If the voter is unable to sign the voter's name, the voter must sign
the poll list by mark, which must be witnessed by one (1) of the poll
clerks or assistant poll clerks acting under IC 3-6-6, who shall place the
poll clerk's or assistant poll clerk's initials after or under the mark.
(d) The poll list (or each line on a poll list sheet provided to take a
voter's current residence address) must include a box under the heading
"Address Unchanged" so that the voter may check the box instead of
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


writing the voter's current address on the poll list, or if an electronic
poll book is used, the poll clerk may check the box after stating to the
voter the address shown on the electronic poll book and receiving an
oral affirmation from the voter that the voter's residence address shown
on the poll list is the voter's current residence address instead of writing
the voter's current residence address on the poll list or reentering the
address in the electronic poll book.
(e) If the voter makes:
(1) a written affirmation on the poll list (or if an electronic poll
book is used, a written affirmation in the manner described in
IC 3-7-39-7) that the voter resides at an address within the
precinct but not at the address shown on the poll list for the
precinct; or
(2) an oral affirmation of a change of address under IC 3-7-39-7;
the county election board shall direct the county voter registration
office to transfer the individual's voter registration record to the address
within the precinct indicated by the voter.
SECTION 18. IC 3-10-1-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.221-2005,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. If electronic voting systems are used in a
precinct, one (1) of the poll clerks shall give a printed political party
identification card to a voter after the voter signs the poll list. of the
political party with which the voter is affiliated. Before entering the
voting booth, the voter must give the party identification card to a
judge, and the judge shall set or have the electronic voting system set
to allow the voter to vote only for the candidates of the voter's party.
After the system is set, the voter may register a vote upon it within the
time provided under IC 3-11-14-26.
SECTION 19. IC 3-10-1-31.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2017,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31.3. (a) This subsection applies to a primary
election within an election district in which more than one (1) political
party chooses the party's nominees or in which a nonpartisan ballot is
available for a voter to vote for an office or on a public question. A
voter whose political party is not recorded on the poll list as required
under section 24 of this chapter shall be shown on the voter's
registration record as having cast an unknown ballot in that primary.
(b) This subsection applies to a primary election within an election
district in which only one (1) political party chooses its nominees and
a nonpartisan ballot is not available. A voter
(1) whose political party recorded on the poll list is not the
political party conducting a primary within the election district
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) who is indicated on the poll list as having requested a
nonpartisan ballot; or
(3) whose political party is not recorded on the poll list as
required under section 24 of this chapter;
shall be shown on the voter's registration record as having cast a ballot
for the political party choosing that political party's nominees in that
primary election. may not cast a ballot in that primary election.
SECTION 20. IC 3-11-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A voter who wants to vote by absentee
ballot must apply to the county election board for an absentee ballot.
Except as provided in subsection (b), the voter must sign the absentee
ballot application.
(b) If a voter with disabilities is unable to sign the absentee ballot
application and the voter has not designated an individual to serve as
attorney in fact for the voter, the voter may designate an individual
eligible to assist the voter under IC 3-11-9-2(a) to sign the application
on behalf of the voter and add the individual's name to the application.
If an individual applies for an absentee ballot as the properly
authorized attorney in fact for a voter, the attorney in fact must attach
a copy of the power of attorney to the application and comply with
subsection (d).
(c) A person may provide an individual with an application for an
absentee ballot with the following information already printed or
otherwise set forth on the application when provided to the individual:
(1) The name of the individual.
(2) The voter registration address of the individual.
(3) The mailing address of the individual.
(4) The date of birth of the individual.
(d) A person may not provide an individual with an application for
an absentee ballot with the following information already printed or
otherwise set forth on the application when provided to the individual:
(1) The address to which the absentee ballot would be mailed, if
different from the voter registration address of the individual.
(2) In a primary election, the major political party ballot requested
by the individual.
(3) In a primary or general election, the types of absentee ballots
requested by the individual.
(4) The reason why the individual is entitled to vote an absentee
ballot:
(A) by mail; or
(B) before an absentee voter board (other than an absentee
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


voter board located in the office of the circuit court clerk or a
satellite office);
in accordance with section 18 of this chapter, IC 3-11-10-24, or
IC 3-11-10-25.
(5) The voter identification number of the individual.
(e) If the county election board determines that an absentee ballot
application does not comply with subsection (d), the board shall
implement the procedures prescribed by section 17.6 of this chapter.
(f) The following statement must be printed in at least 16 point font
size, underlined, and clearly legible print on the envelope of an
absentee ballot application that a person sends to an individual:
"(Name of person sending the absentee ballot application) has
sent you the enclosed application. This is unsolicited and is not
sent by a state or local election official.".
(g) This subsection:
(1) applies only to an application to be mailed to an individual;
and
(2) does not apply to an application provided to an individual
online.
Except for a political party in the state whose nominee received at
least two percent (2%) of the total vote cast for secretary of state
at the last election, no person, including an agency of the state or a
political subdivision, may not provide an individual with an absentee
ballot application unless requested by the individual or a member of the
individual's family listed in IC 3-6-6-7(a)(4). The county election
board may assess a civil penalty of not more than one hundred
dollars ($100) for each violation of this subsection. Penalties
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the election
administration assistance fund established by IC 3-11-6.5-2.
(h) An absentee ballot application must request that the individual
include:
(1) on the individual's ballot application:
(A) either:
(i) the individual's ten (10) digit Indiana driver's license
number issued under IC 9-24-11;
(ii) the individual's ten (10) digit Indiana identification card
number for nondrivers issued under IC 9-24-16; or
(iii) the unique identifying number assigned to the voter's
registration record in the computerized list; and
(B) the last four (4) digits of the voter's Social Security
number; or
(2) with the individual's ballot application, a photocopy of:
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(A) the individual's:
(i) driver's license issued under IC 9-24; or
(ii) Indiana identification card for nondrivers issued under
IC 9-24-16; or
(B) other proof of identification for the individual under
IC 3-5-2.1-84.
Information and documentation described by this subsection that is
included on or with an individual's ballot application is confidential. A
county voter registration office is only required to redact the
confidential information in responding to a public records request
under IC 5-14-3. The application form must state that an applicant may
include only one (1) of the numbers under subdivision (1) or one (1) of
the documents under subdivision (2), but the application may be
delayed if the county election board cannot match at least one (1) of the
numbers described in this subsection with the voter's registration
record.
(i) This subsection applies only to an absentee ballot application
submitted in an electronic format using a module of the computerized
list under IC 3-7-26.3. In order for an individual to access the absentee
ballot application, the individual shall provide one (1) of the following:
(1) The individual's ten (10) digit Indiana driver's license number
issued under IC 9-24-11.
(2) The individual's ten (10) digit Indiana identification card
number for nondrivers issued under IC 9-24-16.
(3) The unique identifying number assigned to the voter's
registration record in the computerized list.
(4) The last four (4) digits of the individual's Social Security
number.
Information described by subdivisions (1) through (4) that is provided
by an individual under this subsection is confidential. A county voter
registration office is only required to redact the confidential
information in responding to a public records request under IC 5-14-3.
(j) The county election board shall implement the procedures
prescribed by section 17.6 of this chapter if the county election board
cannot match at least one (1) of the numbers described in subsection
(h) or (i) with the voter's registration record.
(k) A person who assists an individual in completing any
information described in subsection (d) on an absentee ballot
application shall state under the penalties for perjury the following
information on the application:
(1) The full name, residence and mailing address, and daytime
and evening telephone numbers (if any) of the person providing
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


the assistance.
(2) The date this assistance was provided.
(3) That the person providing the assistance has complied with
Indiana laws governing the submission of absentee ballot
applications.
(4) That the person has no knowledge or reason to believe that the
individual submitting the application:
(A) is ineligible to vote or to cast an absentee ballot; or
(B) did not properly complete and sign the application.
When providing assistance to an individual, the person must, in the
individual's presence and with the individual's consent, provide the
information listed in subsection (d) if the individual is unable to do so.
(l) This subsection does not apply to an employee of the United
States Postal Service or a bonded courier company acting in the
individual's capacity as an employee of the United States Postal Service
or a bonded courier company. A person who receives a completed
absentee ballot application from the individual who has applied for the
absentee ballot shall indicate on the application the date the person
received the application, and file the application with the appropriate
county election board or election division not later than:
(1) noon ten (10) days after the person receives the application;
or
(2) the deadline set by Indiana law for filing the application with
the board;
whichever occurs first. The election division, a county election board,
or a board of elections and registration shall forward an absentee ballot
application to the county election board or board of elections and
registration of the county where the individual resides.
(m) This subsection does not apply to an employee of the United
States Postal Service or a bonded courier company acting in the
individual's capacity as an employee of the United States Postal Service
or a bonded courier company, or to the election division, a county
election board, or a board of elections and registration. A person filing
an absentee ballot application, other than the person's own absentee
ballot application, must include an affidavit with the application. The
affidavit must be signed by the individual who received the completed
application from the applicant. The affidavit must be in a form
prescribed by the election division. The form must include the
following:
(1) A statement of the full name, residence and mailing address,
and daytime and evening telephone numbers (if any) of the person
submitting the application.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) A statement that the person filing the affidavit has complied
with Indiana laws governing the submission of absentee ballot
applications.
(3) The date (or dates) that the absentee ballot applications
attached to the affidavit were received.
(4) A statement that the person has no knowledge or reason to
believe that the individual whose application is to be filed:
(A) is ineligible to vote or to cast an absentee ballot; or
(B) did not properly complete and sign the application.
(5) A statement that the person is executing the affidavit under the
penalties of perjury.
(6) A statement setting forth the penalties for perjury.
(n) The county election board shall record the date and time of the
filing of the affidavit.
SECTION 21. IC 3-11-10-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) This subsection applies to all counties,
except for a county to which IC 3-6-5.2 or IC 3-6-5.6 applies. As an
alternative to voting by mail, a voter is entitled to cast an absentee
ballot before an absentee voter board at any of the following:
(1) One (1) location of the office of the circuit court clerk
designated by the circuit court clerk.
(2) A satellite office established under section 26.3 of this
chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to a county to which IC 3-6-5.2 or
IC 3-6-5.6 applies. As an alternative to voting by mail, a voter is
entitled to cast an absentee ballot before an absentee voter board at any
of the following:
(1) The office of the board of elections and registration.
(2) A satellite office established under section 26.3 of this
chapter.
(c) Except for a location designated under subsection (a)(1), a
location of the office of the circuit court clerk must be established as
a satellite office under section 26.3 of this chapter in order to be used
as a location at which a voter is entitled to cast an absentee ballot
before an absentee voter board under this section.
(d) The voter must do the following before being permitted to vote:
(1) This subdivision does not apply to a county that uses
electronic poll books for voting under this section. Sign an
application on the form prescribed by the election division under
IC 3-11-4-5.1. The application must be received by the circuit
court clerk not later than the time prescribed by IC 3-11-4-3.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) This subdivision applies only to a county that uses electronic
poll books for voting under this section and in which the ballot is
cast on an electronic voting system. The voter must do the
following:
(A) If the county election board has prescribed an affidavit
under subsection (e) that includes a unique identifier to
comply with section 26.2(c)(3) of this chapter, make and
subscribe to the affidavit.
(B) Sign the electronic poll book.
(C) Provide proof of identification.
(3) This subdivision applies only to a county that uses electronic
poll books for voting under this section and in which the ballot is
cast on an optical scan voting system. The voter must do the
following:
(A) Sign the electronic poll book.
(B) Provide proof of identification.
(C) Sign the affidavit prescribed by section 29 of this chapter.
(e) The county election board may:
(1) prescribe an affidavit that includes a unique identifier; or
(2) establish a procedure to produce a document, label, or
electronic record that is associated with each voter and includes
a unique identifier;
to comply with section 26.2(c)(3) of this chapter. After the county
election board approves an affidavit or procedure described in this
subsection and before the affidavit or procedure is used in an election,
the county election board shall file a copy of the affidavit or a brief
description of the procedure with the election division to assist the state
recount commission in conducting proceedings under IC 3-12-11.
(f) The voter may vote before the board not more than twenty-eight
(28) ten (10) days nor later than noon on the day before election day.
If the close of a voter registration period is transferred under
IC 3-5-4-1.5 from twenty-nine (29) days to a later date due to the
Columbus Day holiday, the voter may vote before the board on the first
day following the day on which the voter registration period closes.
(g) An absent uniformed services voter who is eligible to vote by
absentee ballot in the circuit court clerk's office under IC 3-7-36-14
may vote before the board not earlier than twenty-eight (28) days
before the election and not later than noon on election day. If the close
of a voter registration period is transferred under IC 3-5-4-1.5 from
twenty-nine (29) days to a later date due to the Columbus Day holiday,
the voter may vote before the board on the first day following the day
on which the voter registration period closes. If a voter described by
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


this subsection wishes to cast an absentee ballot during the period
beginning at noon on the day before election day and ending at noon on
election day, the county election board or absentee voter board may
receive and process the ballot at a location designated by resolution of
the county election board.
(h) The absentee voter board in the office of the circuit court clerk
must permit voters to cast absentee ballots under this section for at
least seven (7) hours on each of the two (2) Saturdays preceding
election day. However, the county election board may adopt a
resolution authorizing the circuit court clerk to:
(1) use the office of the circuit court clerk designated in
subsection (a)(1); or
(2) establish a satellite office under section 26.3 of this chapter;
to permit voters to cast absentee ballots under this section for at least
four (4) hours on the third Saturday preceding election day.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h), in a county with a population of
less than twenty thousand (20,000), the absentee voter board in the
office of the circuit court clerk, with the approval of the county election
board, may reduce the number of hours available to cast absentee
ballots under this section to a minimum of four (4) hours on each of the
two (2) Saturdays preceding election day.
(j) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21081, a voter casting an absentee
ballot under this section must be:
(1) permitted to verify in a private and independent manner the
votes selected by the voter before the ballot is cast and counted;
(2) provided with the opportunity to change the ballot or correct
any error in a private and independent manner before the ballot is
cast and counted, including the opportunity to receive a
replacement ballot if the voter is otherwise unable to change or
correct the ballot; and
(3) notified before the ballot is cast regarding the effect of casting
multiple votes for the office and provided an opportunity to
correct the ballot before the ballot is cast and counted.
(k) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21081, when an absentee ballot is
provided under this section, the board must also provide the voter with:
(1) information concerning the effect of casting multiple votes for
an office; and
(2) instructions on how to correct the ballot before the ballot is
cast and counted, including the issuance of replacement ballots.
(l) If:
(1) the voter is unable or declines to present the proof of
identification; or
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) a member of the board determines that the proof of
identification provided by the voter does not qualify as proof of
identification under IC 3-5-2.1-84;
the voter shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot.
(m) This subsection applies to a voter who casts an absentee ballot
that is treated as a provisional ballot under subsection (l). The board
shall provide the voter, both orally and in writing, an explanation of
what actions, if any, the voter must take in order to have the voter's
ballot counted. The election division shall prescribe the form of the
explanation required by this subsection.
(n) A voter casting an absentee ballot under this section is entitled
to cast the voter's ballot in accordance with IC 3-11-9.
(o) The following apply in a primary election:
(1) A voter entitled to cast an absentee ballot before an absentee
voter board under this section shall mark the voter's political party
ballot selection on the electronic poll book instead of
communicating the selection to the poll clerks.
(2) A voter casting an absentee ballot under this chapter may not
change the voter's choice of the voter's political party after the
voter has been mailed or otherwise provided with a primary ballot
containing the candidates of that party.
SECTION 22. IC 3-11-10-26.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2024,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.3. (a) A county election board may adopt a
resolution to authorize the circuit court clerk to establish satellite
offices in the county where voters may cast absentee ballots before an
absentee voter board.
(b) To be adopted under this section, a resolution must be adopted
by the unanimous vote of the board's entire membership.
(c) A resolution adopted under this section must do the following:
(1) Establish at least one (1) satellite office for every five
thousand (5,000) voters from the calculation of the following:
(A) For a primary election, the average of all voters who
cast an absentee ballot before an absentee voter board
during the previous four (4) primary elections conducted
on even-numbered years.
(B) For a general election, the average of all voters who
cast an absentee ballot before an absentee voter board
during the previous four (4) general elections conducted on
even-numbered years.
(1) (2) State the locations of the satellite offices for both the
primary election and general election.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


(2) (3) State the hours at which absentee voting may occur at the
satellite offices.
(d) The resolution may contain other provisions the board considers
useful.
(e) If a resolution is adopted under this section for a primary
election, the following apply:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), the locations of the
satellite offices and the hours at which absentee voting may occur
at the satellite offices established for the primary election must be
used for the subsequent general or municipal election.
(2) The board may, by unanimous vote of the board's entire
membership, amend the resolution to modify, for the subsequent
general or municipal election:
(A) the locations of the satellite offices; and
(B) the hours at which absentee voting may occur at the
satellite offices.
A board in a county designated as a vote center county under
IC 3-11-18.1 that amends a resolution under subdivision (2) shall also
amend its plan under IC 3-11-18.1-15 to conform to the amendment. A
board may not amend the resolution to change the minimum
number of satellite offices established under subsection (c)(1).
(f) If a resolution is adopted under this section, the procedure for
casting an absentee ballot at a satellite office must, except as provided
in this section, be substantially the same as the procedure for casting an
absentee ballot in the office of the circuit court clerk under section 26
of this chapter.
(g) A voter casting an absentee ballot under this section is entitled
to cast the voter's ballot in accordance with IC 3-11-9.
(h) A satellite office established by a circuit court clerk under this
section must comply with the polling place accessibility requirements
of IC 3-11-8.
(i) A resolution adopted under this section expires January 1 of the
year immediately after the year in which the resolution is adopted.
SECTION 23. IC 35-52-3-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. IC 3-7-26.4-14 defines a
crime concerning commercial use of the computerized list.
SECTION 24. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The secretary of
state shall do the following:
(1) Analyze and estimate the cost of the following:
(A) Use of election equipment by certified vendors in
Indiana, including voting systems and electronic poll
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149


books.
(B) Use of election equipment that is currently certified in
Indiana accounting for election processes in place in
Indiana.
(C) Use of election equipment vendors that are not
currently certified in Indiana.
(D) Phasing out electronic voting systems in Indiana,
including systems that have a voter verifiable audit trail
printer that connects to an electronic voting system.
(E) Utilizing paper ballots and hand counting paper
ballots.
(2) Analyze and estimate any cost savings that may be realized
by:
(A) using election equipment from vendors that are not
currently certified in Indiana; and
(B) requiring the state to purchase all election equipment
for the counties.
(3) Prepare proposed legislation to decrease the cost of using
certified voting systems in Indiana.
(4) Conduct at least three (3) public meetings on the topics
studied under this SECTION in accordance with subsection
(b).
(5) Report the results of the studies conducted under this
SECTION to the legislative council in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 before November 1, 2026.
(b) The secretary of state shall conduct at least one (1) public
meeting under subsection (a)(4) in each of the following regions of
Indiana:
(1) The northern region.
(2) The central region.
(3) The southern region.
(c) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
2026 IN 1096—LS 6428/DI 149